Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 19. Proceeding for Determination of Shareholders.

§ 13.1-776.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires, the term:

“Asserted shareholder”
means an entity holding a certificate for one or more shares of stock of a corporation on which it is stated to be the owner thereof but which is not listed as a shareholder on the records of the corporation.

“Corporation”
shall have the meaning provided in §

13.1-603

.

“Entity”
means one or more persons, partnerships, unincorporated associations, corporations or other organizations entitled to hold property in its own name.

“Lost shareholder”
means a shareholder shown by the records of a corporation to have been a shareholder for more than seven years but who, throughout that period, neither claimed a dividend or other sum nor corresponded in writing with the corporation or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the corporation and the corporation does not know the location of the shareholder at the end of such seven-year period.

“Shareholder”
means an entity shown by the records of a corporation to be the owner of one or more shares of its outstanding capital stock.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-156; 1979, c. 90; 1983, c. 190; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “been a shareholder” for “been a stockholder” in the definition of “Lost shareholder.”

Law Review.

For article, “The New Virginia Stock Corporation Act: A Primer,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 67 (1985).

§ 13.1-777.
Institution of proceeding to determine shareholders.

Whenever the records of a corporation are such that its board of directors determines that there are entities that appear to be lost shareholders who may or may not be entitled to the shares of stock shown by its records or that there may be asserted shareholders, the board of directors may, by a suit in equity brought in the circuit court of the city or county in which its registered office is located, begin a proceeding for a determination of the identity of its proper shareholders.

Each lost shareholder shall be named a party defendant. Asserted shareholders shall be joined as defendants as persons unknown. Service shall be effected by order of publication pursuant to §

8.01-316

. The Commonwealth shall be named a party defendant and service shall be effected on the Attorney General.

The court shall hear all evidence that shall be available as to the identity of lost shareholders and asserted shareholders and whether or not they are entitled to own shares of stock of the corporation.

The court, on the basis of such evidence, shall determine, to the best of its ability, the identity of the lost shareholders and asserted shareholders of the corporation. Such determination shall be final, subject to appeal to the Supreme Court of Virginia.

The court, in its final decree, shall declare that the shares owned by lost shareholders or asserted shareholders and any dividends declared thereon and unpaid shall be the property of the Commonwealth in accordance with §

55.1-2511

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-157 to 13.1-161; 1979, c. 90; 1985, c. 522.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “§

55.1-2511

” for “§ 55-210.6:1 of the Code of Virginia.”